Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-837
School board; subpoena power.

The school board may on its own behalf, or shall upon the request of the certificated employee or his or her representative or at the request of the school district administration or the superintendent or the superintendent's designee, (1) subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses residing either within or outside the state for the purpose of appearing and testifying at any hearing provided for in sections 79-824 to 79-842 and for the purpose of having such witnesses' depositions taken, in the manner prescribed by law for the taking of depositions in civil actions in the district court, and (2) issue subpoenas for the production of any papers, books, accounts, and documents.

Laws 1982, LB 259, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,119;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 467.

Deposition, civil procedure, see section 25-1242.